Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-112
Department heads; rules and regulations; power to make.

The head of each department is empowered to prescribe regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the government of his department, the conduct of its employees and clerks, the distribution and performance of its business, and the custody, use and preservation of the records, papers, books, documents and property pertaining thereto.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 11, p. 439;

C.S.1922, § 7252;

C.S.1929, § 81-114;

R.S.1943, § 81-112.

Head of department herein referred to represents exactly the same head of executive department referred to in the Constitution. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).